third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/fo_FO/fo_FO.aff
SET ISO8859-1

FLAG num

NOSPLITSUGS

NEEDAFFIX 1
FORBIDDENWORD 2

TRY áðíóúýæøesianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwzÁÐÍÓÚÝÆØESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWZ

REP 29
REP a æ
REP æ a
REP á a
REP a á
REP a að
REP i y
REP y i
REP i ið
REP í ý
REP ý í
REP e ó
REP e a
REP e æ
REP j ð
REP v ð
REP g ð
REP ó ø
REP ø ó
REP i u
REP u i
REP f v
REP v f
REP ir ur
REP ur ir
REP un um
REP k g
REP g k
REP a o
REP o a

MAP 8
MAP aá
MAP aæ
MAP iy
MAP íý
MAP óo
MAP oø
MAP uú
MAP ie

#abbadadda
SFX 3 N 11
SFX 3 0 a .
SFX 3 0 an .
SFX 3 0 anna .
SFX 3 0 u .
SFX 3 0 um .
SFX 3 0 una .
SFX 3 0 uni .
SFX 3 0 unnar .
SFX 3 0 unum .
SFX 3 0 ur .
SFX 3 0 urnar .

#abbati
SFX 4 N 12
SFX 4 0 a .
SFX 4 0 an .
SFX 4 0 anna .
SFX 4 0 ans .
SFX 4 0 anum .
SFX 4 0 ar .
SFX 4 0 arnar .
SFX 4 0 arnir .
SFX 4 0 i .
SFX 4 0 in .
SFX 4 0 um .
SFX 4 0 unum .

#aftna
SFX 5 N 1
SFX 5 0 ur .

#aftna
SFX 6 N 5
SFX 6 0 a .
SFX 6 0 að .
SFX 6 0 aði .
SFX 6 0 aðu .
SFX 6 0 ar .

#adjunktur
SFX 7 N 14
SFX 7 0 a .
SFX 7 0 anna .
SFX 7 0 ar .
SFX 7 0 arnar .
SFX 7 0 arnir .
SFX 7 0 i .
SFX 7 0 in .
SFX 7 0 inum .
SFX 7 0 s .
SFX 7 0 sins .
SFX 7 0 um .
SFX 7 0 unum .
SFX 7 0 ur .
SFX 7 0 urin .

#aðalgrann
SFX 8 N 11
SFX 8 0 a .
SFX 8 0 anna .
SFX 8 0 ar .
SFX 8 0 arinnar .
SFX 8 0 in .
SFX 8 0 ina .
SFX 8 0 ini .
SFX 8 0 ir .
SFX 8 0 irnar .
SFX 8 0 um .
SFX 8 0 unum .

#abstraktur
SFX 9 N 7
SFX 9 0 a .
SFX 9 0 an .
SFX 9 0 ar .
SFX 9 0 ari .
SFX 9 0 ir .
SFX 9 0 um .
SFX 9 0 ur .

#afturhjól
SFX 10 N 10
SFX 10 0 a .
SFX 10 0 anna .
SFX 10 0 i .
SFX 10 0 ið .
SFX 10 0 ini .
SFX 10 0 inum .
SFX 10 0 s .
SFX 10 0 sins .
SFX 10 0 um .
SFX 10 0 unum .

#aðalhending
SFX 11 N 11
SFX 11 0 ing .
SFX 11 0 inga .
SFX 11 0 inganna .
SFX 11 0 ingar .
SFX 11 0 ingarinnar .
SFX 11 0 ingarnar .
SFX 11 0 ingin .
SFX 11 0 ingina .
SFX 11 0 ingini .
SFX 11 0 ingum .
SFX 11 0 ingunum .

#abbaligur
SFX 12 N 9
SFX 12 0 lig .
SFX 12 0 liga .
SFX 12 0 ligan .
SFX 12 0 ligar .
SFX 12 0 ligari .
SFX 12 0 ligir .
SFX 12 0 ligt .
SFX 12 0 ligum .
SFX 12 0 ligur .

#aftanskin
SFX 13 N 5
SFX 13 0 i .
SFX 13 0 ið .
SFX 13 0 inum .
SFX 13 0 s .
SFX 13 0 sins .

#afturbleytur
SFX 14 N 8
SFX 14 0 a .
SFX 14 0 an .
SFX 14 0 ar .
SFX 14 0 ari .
SFX 14 0 ir .
SFX 14 0 t .
SFX 14 0 um .
SFX 14 0 ur .

#aðaleyðkenni
SFX 15 N 11
SFX 15 0 a .
SFX 15 0 anna .
SFX 15 0 i .
SFX 15 0 ið .
SFX 15 0 ini .
SFX 15 0 inum .
SFX 15 0 ir .
SFX 15 0 is .
SFX 15 0 isins .
SFX 15 0 um .
SFX 15 0 unum .

#afturfarin
SFX 16 N 8
SFX 16 0 ið .
SFX 16 0 in .
SFX 16 0 na .
SFX 16 0 nan .
SFX 16 0 nar .
SFX 16 0 nari .
SFX 16 0 nir .
SFX 16 0 num .

#advent
SFX 17 N 5
SFX 17 0 ar .
SFX 17 0 arinnar .
SFX 17 0 in .
SFX 17 0 ina .
SFX 17 0 ini .

#aftursvar
SFX 18 N 3
SFX 18 0 ini .
SFX 18 0 um .
SFX 18 0 unum .

#afturatløga
SFX 19 N 6
SFX 19 0 a .
SFX 19 0 an .
SFX 19 0 u .
SFX 19 0 una .
SFX 19 0 uni .
SFX 19 0 unnar .

#aðalmaður
SFX 20 N 15
SFX 20 0 maður .
SFX 20 0 maðurin .
SFX 20 0 mann .
SFX 20 0 manna .
SFX 20 0 mannanna .
SFX 20 0 manni .
SFX 20 0 mannin .
SFX 20 0 manninum .
SFX 20 0 mans .
SFX 20 0 mansins .
SFX 20 0 menn .
SFX 20 0 menninar .
SFX 20 0 menninir .
SFX 20 0 monnum .
SFX 20 0 monnunum .

#afturábendur
SFX 21 N 8
SFX 21 d t .
SFX 21 0 a .
SFX 21 0 an .
SFX 21 0 ar .
SFX 21 0 ari .
SFX 21 0 ir .
SFX 21 0 um .
SFX 21 0 ur .

#afturøvutur
SFX 22 N 8
SFX 22 0 ut .
SFX 22 0 uta .
SFX 22 0 utan .
SFX 22 0 utar .
SFX 22 0 utari .
SFX 22 0 utir .
SFX 22 0 utum .
SFX 22 0 utur .

#aftureining
SFX 23 N 6
SFX 23 0 ing .
SFX 23 0 ingar .
SFX 23 0 ingarinnar .
SFX 23 0 ingin .
SFX 23 0 ingina .
SFX 23 0 ingini .

#aftansangur
SFX 24 N 2
SFX 24 0 um .
SFX 24 0 unum .

#afturhaldni
SFX 25 N 5
SFX 25 0 i .
SFX 25 0 ið .
SFX 25 0 inum .
SFX 25 0 is .
SFX 25 0 isins .

#afturstigshiti
SFX 26 N 6
SFX 26 0 a .
SFX 26 0 an .
SFX 26 0 ans .
SFX 26 0 anum .
SFX 26 0 i .
SFX 26 0 in .

#afturvongur
SFX 27 N 7
SFX 27 0 i .
SFX 27 0 in .
SFX 27 0 inum .
SFX 27 0 s .
SFX 27 0 sins .
SFX 27 0 ur .
SFX 27 0 urin .

#aftansongur
SFX 28 N 14
SFX 28 0 a .
SFX 28 0 anna .
SFX 28 0 i .
SFX 28 0 in .
SFX 28 0 inum .
SFX 28 0 ir .
SFX 28 0 irnar .
SFX 28 0 irnir .
SFX 28 0 s .
SFX 28 0 sins .
SFX 28 0 um .
SFX 28 0 unum .
SFX 28 0 ur .
SFX 28 0 urin .

#afturlæstur
SFX 29 N 1
SFX 29 0 um .

#akarn
SFX 30 N 7
SFX 30 0 a .
SFX 30 0 anna .
SFX 30 0 i .
SFX 30 0 ið .
SFX 30 0 inum .
SFX 30 0 s .
SFX 30 0 sins .

#altarslag
SFX 31 N 12
SFX 31 0 lag .
SFX 31 0 laga .
SFX 31 0 laganna .
SFX 31 0 lagi .
SFX 31 0 lagið .
SFX 31 0 lagnum .
SFX 31 0 lags .
SFX 31 0 lagsins .
SFX 31 0 løg .
SFX 31 0 løgini .
SFX 31 0 løgum .
SFX 31 0 løgunum .

#aksil
SFX 32 N 13
SFX 32 0 il .
SFX 32 0 ilin .
SFX 32 0 ils .
SFX 32 0 ilsins .
SFX 32 0 la .
SFX 32 0 lanna .
SFX 32 0 lar .
SFX 32 0 larnar .
SFX 32 0 larnir .
SFX 32 0 li .
SFX 32 0 linum .
SFX 32 0 lum .
SFX 32 0 lunum .

#aldavinur
SFX 33 N 14
SFX 33 0 a .
SFX 33 0 anna .
SFX 33 0 ar .
SFX 33 0 arins .
SFX 33 0 i .
SFX 33 0 in .
SFX 33 0 inum .
SFX 33 0 ir .
SFX 33 0 irnar .
SFX 33 0 irnir .
SFX 33 0 um .
SFX 33 0 unum .
SFX 33 0 ur .
SFX 33 0 urin .

#afturhond
SFX 34 N 5
SFX 34 0 in .
SFX 34 0 ina .
SFX 34 0 ini .
SFX 34 0 um .
SFX 34 0 unum .

#afturkleyv
SFX 35 N 10
SFX 35 0 a .
SFX 35 0 anna .
SFX 35 0 ar .
SFX 35 0 arinnar .
SFX 35 0 arnar .
SFX 35 0 in .
SFX 35 0 ina .
SFX 35 0 ini .
SFX 35 0 um .
SFX 35 0 unum .

#agaleysur
SFX 36 N 9
SFX 36 0 leys .
SFX 36 0 leysa .
SFX 36 0 leysan .
SFX 36 0 leysar .
SFX 36 0 leysari .
SFX 36 0 leysir .
SFX 36 0 leyst .
SFX 36 0 leysum .
SFX 36 0 leysur .

#afturfjórðingur
SFX 37 N 15
SFX 37 0 ing .
SFX 37 0 inga .
SFX 37 0 inganna .
SFX 37 0 ingar .
SFX 37 0 ingarnar .
SFX 37 0 ingarnir .
SFX 37 0 ingi .
SFX 37 0 ingin .
SFX 37 0 inginum .
SFX 37 0 ings .
SFX 37 0 ingsins .
SFX 37 0 ingum .
SFX 37 0 ingunum .
SFX 37 0 ingur .
SFX 37 0 ingurin .

#allahalgannadagur
SFX 38 N 15
SFX 38 0 dag .
SFX 38 0 daga .
SFX 38 0 daganna .
SFX 38 0 dagar .
SFX 38 0 dagarnar .
SFX 38 0 dagarnir .
SFX 38 0 dagin .
SFX 38 0 dags .
SFX 38 0 dagsins .
SFX 38 0 dagur .
SFX 38 0 dagurin .
SFX 38 0 degi .
SFX 38 0 degnum .
SFX 38 0 døgum .
SFX 38 0 døgunum .

#aftanlestur
SFX 39 N 3
SFX 39 0 in .
SFX 39 0 s .
SFX 39 0 sins .

#afturmastur
SFX 40 N 1
SFX 40 0 in .

#afturhond
SFX 41 N 2
SFX 41 0 ur .
SFX 41 0 urnar .

#afturtog
SFX 42 N 10
SFX 42 0 a .
SFX 42 0 anna .
SFX 42 0 i .
SFX 42 0 ið .
SFX 42 0 ini .
SFX 42 0 num .
SFX 42 0 s .
SFX 42 0 sins .
SFX 42 0 um .
SFX 42 0 unum .

#avtaka
SFX 43 N 1
SFX 43 0 u .

#aksast
SFX 44 N 3
SFX 44 0 aðist .
SFX 44 0 aðust .
SFX 44 0 ast .

#aðalmál
SFX 45 N 11
SFX 45 0 mál .
SFX 45 0 mála .
SFX 45 0 málanna .
SFX 45 0 máli .
SFX 45 0 málið .
SFX 45 0 málini .
SFX 45 0 málinum .
SFX 45 0 máls .
SFX 45 0 málsins .
SFX 45 0 málum .
SFX 45 0 málunum .

#ana
SFX 46 N 6
SFX 46 d a .
SFX 46 d di .
SFX 46 d du .
SFX 46 d ir .
SFX 46 d t .
SFX 46 0 ur .

#Afrika
SFX 47 N 1
SFX 47 0 a .

#ananas
SFX 48 N 9
SFX 48 0 a .
SFX 48 0 anna .
SFX 48 0 i .
SFX 48 0 ið .
SFX 48 0 ini .
SFX 48 0 ins .
SFX 48 0 inum .
SFX 48 0 um .
SFX 48 0 unum .

#alskhugsmikil
SFX 49 N 8
SFX 49 0 mikið .
SFX 49 0 mikil .
SFX 49 0 mikla .
SFX 49 0 miklan .
SFX 49 0 miklar .
SFX 49 0 miklari .
SFX 49 0 miklir .
SFX 49 0 miklum .

#armingshús
SFX 50 N 10
SFX 50 0 hús .
SFX 50 0 húsa .
SFX 50 0 húsanna .
SFX 50 0 húsi .
SFX 50 0 húsið .
SFX 50 0 húsini .
SFX 50 0 húsins .
SFX 50 0 húsinum .
SFX 50 0 húsum .
SFX 50 0 húsunum .

#aðalsfólk
SFX 51 N 11
SFX 51 0 fólk .
SFX 51 0 fólka .
SFX 51 0 fólkanna .
SFX 51 0 fólki .
SFX 51 0 fólkið .
SFX 51 0 fólkini .
SFX 51 0 fólkinum .
SFX 51 0 fólks .
SFX 51 0 fólksins .
SFX 51 0 fólkum .
SFX 51 0 fólkunum .

#adventskransur
SFX 52 N 13
SFX 52 0 a .
SFX 52 0 anna .
SFX 52 0 ar .
SFX 52 0 arnar .
SFX 52 0 arnir .
SFX 52 0 i .
SFX 52 0 in .
SFX 52 0 ins .
SFX 52 0 inum .
SFX 52 0 um .
SFX 52 0 unum .
SFX 52 0 ur .
SFX 52 0 urin .
