third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/fo_FO/fo_FO.dic
berjakrepp/1,37
blómuøgn/34
borgarastríð/42
boyufest/1,15
bráðvond/1,24
brævaloynd/8
brattgeing/1,25
breyð/98,156,252,405,361,359,36,178,160
bringubrósk/13
brøk/1,41,41
brotsteigarmark/10,30
búflutnings/1,38
búkhinnubrun/1,26
búkreim/35
búkstór/14
bygdarfe/1,31
byggakur/39
dálk/1,6,23
dansisal/28
detalj/1,3
deyðatyst/9
deyðseyðakrógv/40
dieselmotor/7
dimmjørp/29
djarv/1,12,280,263,84
djóra/1,139,204,81,380,402,45,316,260,189
djóraheim/27
dragbjálk/1,4
drift/8,130,6,37
duratjald/30
eftirgáan/17
eftiryrk/1,11
eg/1,16
eldfrens/52
ellisakfør/18
embætis/1,429,51,105,81,50,202,12,402,20,90,106
ern/1,44
eydnu/1,205,38,141,261,36,12,79,229,20,49,226,116,184,166
eyðrænd/1,46
eyðvald/21
eyroyð/1,19
fak/10,51,12,249,77,439
fedrahús/48
ferðaseðlakostnað/33
fínnappað/1,5
fjarsýn/1,25
fjølmið/1,32
flags/48,22
fløg/1,18,6
fordóma/1,200,36
forhøll/34
formanspøll/1,24
fótkvik/14
fóts/1,45
framlykt/8
framsæt/1,15
fuglaskarn/13
fullger/47
fundar/1,282,96,38,133,51,169,356,72,152,300,173
fútaforboð/42
fyritaksand/1,26
fýrtalv/10
gáloysis/1,408,12
geilatík/35
geislafór/43
geislamegnað/9
genturóður/40
giftingaraldur/39
gjótrem/1,41
glýr/1,44
gomalur/29
grindaførn/1,37
grindakík/7
gudmóð/27
gullmur/1,3
hæsagang/28
hálvasól/17
hamar/39,4,298
harklalop/1,16
hav/30,30,93,434,306,238,123,92,139,354,204,105,206,83,4,202,327,333,20,450,388,95,142,100,101,249
háva/1,36,12,49,368
heimafe/1,31
hest/274,51,192,20,7
hesta/1,50,192,20,288,370
hestafans/52
heystbrøgd/18
hjáveið/1,19
høgra/1,197,20
høld/18,46,7
host/48,6,26
høvuðrokn/1,23
huml/1,19,26
hundavakt/8
hungursmánað/33
hvess/48,76,15,11,37,255
íbygd/21
ílatog/42
illpjøsk/1,22
illtrúgv/40,59
innannør/1,11
innantannalestur/39
innihalds/1,36,12,79,49,226
inntøkufíggjað/9
innvik/10,4
jánkað/1,5
javnstødd/29
kaffiket/1,32
Kanad/1,47
kappskut/1,43
kart/1,25
kettuløbb/1,24
kistubotn/27
kjarnorkukøst/7
klandr/1,44,22
klípiteng/1,41
klíputong/34
kløkk/24,6,480
kó/42
Kollfjarðardal/149,28
konufólkatroyggj/1,3
kráku/1,403,330,143,268,45,414,242
krúss/48,6
kuls/1,6,16,11
kvæðar/1,4
kvakan/17
kveik/8,13,4,4,11
kynblend/1,37
lagkleyv/35
lagnu/1,38,49,298
langapar/30
leiðarasess/255,52
lembd/1,46
lesullar/1,51
leys/10,12,302,14
leysakav/1,26
lið/8,98,98,98,98,241,6,62,329,4,59,11,309,114,152,683,94,94,325
líkabørn/18
listafe/1,31
lítlatá/40
lívsstøð/1,15
lønaraldur/39
longdarmát/10
loynikeyp/1,20,60,95
lúk/1,3,47,6,6,23
lukkusæl/19,14
lúnutrog/42
maktgreðing/7
mállæru/1,12
mannfólkahend/1,41
mansverð/33
máttsug/1,43
misroknað/1,5
móðuralsk/27
moldbøk/1,32
mór/1,19,4,22
mynda/1,77,96,50,20,45,226,260,379,184,146,231,97
myndagát/1,3
myndvev/1,11
mýriseyðaleyk/28
nask/1,44,84
navnfrom/29
niðurtraðkað/9
ódnarbørdag/1,24
ógild/6,138,11,21,158
ómaka/1,36,49
ómaksgjald/30
omanreið/1,23
orðloyp/1,5,16
ósamheing/1,25
ostsker/1,4
ótespi/1,12
ovtak/1,47
ovurfisking/17
ovurundr/1,6
oyðidróp/1,43
oyðimørk/34
persill/1,19
prins/6,52
pumpu/1,316,287,288,125,437,50,72
puss/48,48,6,92
rættarbøk/18
regn/13,38,276,144,180,12,79,49,132,298,125,101
reyðvín/13
rim/35,6
ró/17,248,501,31,12
roðstúku/1,51
rómverskkatólsk/14
royvd/1,46
rusk/10,6,437,38,360,20,391,142,22,100,384,167
seinni/1,38
sergreinað/1,5
sernámsdep/1,32
sjálvstýrd/21
sjask/10,22,100
skein/8,3
skeytafingur/39
skiftisnæming/7
skipsbunk/1,26
skógv/6,853,33
skupluhjól/10
slip/1,19,6,73,22
slysn/13,15
smíl/10,27
snørisróður/40
sodn/1,6,23
spreingiræs/1,41
spruttløpp/1,24
spýggjugrís/52
stætta/1,36,372,414,107
steinrenn/1,68,11
stig/42,179,215,31,372,362,94
stigahill/35
stong/34
størv/18,29
stuðlað/1,5
súðuviknað/9
súkkl/1,3,6
summarsang/28
svartlygn/1,25
svartskort/1,22
tíma/1,389,12,328,201,385,166,237
tin/13,6
ting/10,282,174,96,253,179,38,123,197,329,107,105,169,50,11,410,20,45,106,72,173,407,85,89,70,111,51
tjóðar/1,45,414,38,137,260,97
tjóvalyk/1,32
trúarfe/1,31
tvítók/43
úld/1,6
umgyrd/21
ung/6,44,468,418,51,143,4,12,20,14
uppal/1,16,23
uppdagar/1,4
uppnevnd/1,46
úrkynjan/17
úrskilj/1,23
útlend/1,37
útvarp/30,6
vatnber/47,4
vesturlond/18
vestursíð/1,19
viðber/1,4,11
viðgerðarhátt/438,33
villross/48
vind/3,68,6,170,205,38,266,296,81,144,11,49,387,116,7,101
virðis/1,168,36,207,229,201,49,154,372
vistar/1,169,50,320,209,150
yndisvæn/14
